Rhode Island, session 2025, HB6369.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Chapter 42-9.1 of the General Laws entitled "Office of Health Care
Advocate" is hereby amended by adding thereto the following section:
42-9.1-7. Hospital receivership.
(a) The health care advocate may petition the superior court for the immediate appointment
of a receiver if:
(1) A hospital’s corporate assets are being misapplied or are in danger of being wasted or
lost;
(2) The hospital is being mismanaged, is in severe financial distress, or is insolvent; or
(3) The hospital is being operated in a manner which will have a detrimental impact on the
health, safety, or well-being of patients and/or their medical care.
(b) The superior court shall approve the health care advocate’s petition for immediate
appointment of a receiver if such appointment would:
(1) Facilitate the management of the hospital;
(2) Protect the health, safety, or well-being of patients and/or their medical care; or
(3) Ensure compliance with or advance any of the purposes of the hospital conversions act,
§ 23-17.14-2 et seq.
(c) In any proceeding for appointment of a receiver pursuant to this section, it shall not be
necessary for the health care advocate to show that, without relief, the injury that will result will be

irreparable, or that the remedy at law is inadequate.
(d) The court may, as it deems necessary or appropriate, confer upon any receiver appointed
under this section any or all of the powers available to a receiver under common law, the laws of
this state, and/or the rules of its courts regarding receiverships.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC002519
========
LC002519 - Page 2 of 3